Massachusetts, session 194th, H273.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 51B of Chapter 119 of the General Laws, as so appearing in the
2022 Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after subsection (a) the following
paragraphs:-
(1) The department shall create and utilize a comprehensive maltreatment coding system
that provides a standardized method for categorizing instances of abuse and neglect by severity
for families during the initial investigation phase.
(2) Categories should include, but are not limited to: (i) parental abuse; (ii) imminent risk
of serious harm (iii) labor trafficking; (iv) emotional abuse; (v) neglect; (vi) physical abuse; (vii)
sexual abuse; (viii) exploitation
(3) The coding system should further include coding based on abuse related to sexual
orientation, gender identity, and expression in an effort to provide family preservation and
of 2

acceptance education; as well as racial discrimination for youth who are not in the care of their
family of origin.
(4) The coding system should be applied upon opening a case and used in conjunction
with existing software to assist in the assessment and continued evaluation of ongoing cases.
(5) The department shall review the categories of the system at least every two years and
update as needed.
of 2